Louisiana, session 2026, HB486.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:2354(H) and Part II of Chapter 28 of Title 37 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 37:2371, are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2354. Fees
* * *
H. The board may, upon initial request and renewal, collect a fee not to
exceed fifty dollars from any individual holding compact authorization to practice
under the psychology interjurisdictional compact whose home state is Louisiana, in
accordance with R.S. 37:2371. The board shall adopt rules in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Subsection.
* * *
Page 1 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
PART II. PSYCHOLOGY INTERJURISDICTIONAL COMPACT (PSYPACT)
§2371. Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact
ARTICLE I. PURPOSE
A. States license psychologists in order to protect the public through
verification of education, training, and experience and ensure accountability for
professional practice.
B. This compact is intended to accomplish all of the following:
(1) To regulate the day-to-day practice of telepsychology, the provision of
psychological services using telecommunication technologies, by psychologists
across state boundaries in the performance of their psychological practice as assigned
by an appropriate authority.
(2) To regulate the temporary in-person, face-to-face practice of psychology
by psychologists across state boundaries for thirty days within a calendar year in the
performance of their psychological practice as assigned by an appropriate authority.
(3) To authorize state psychology regulatory authorities to afford legal
recognition, in a manner consistent with the terms of the compact, to psychologists
licensed in another state.
C. This compact recognizes that states have a vested interest in protecting
the public's health and safety through their licensing and regulation of psychologists
and that such state regulation will best protect public health and safety.
D. This compact does not apply when a psychologist is licensed in both the
home and receiving states.
E. This compact does not apply to permanent in-person, face-to-face
practice; the compact allows for authorization of temporary psychological practice.
This compact is designed to achieve all of the following purposes and objectives:
(1) Increase public access to professional psychological services by allowing
for telepsychological practice across state lines as well as temporary in-person,
face-to-face services into a state where the psychologist is not licensed to practice
psychology.
Page 2 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
(2) Enhance the states' ability to protect the public's health and safety,
especially client and patient safety.
(3) Encourage the cooperation of compact states in the areas of psychology
licensure and regulation.
(4) Facilitate the exchange of information between compact states regarding
psychologist licensure, adverse actions, and disciplinary history.
(5) Promote compliance with the laws governing psychological practice in
each compact state.
(6) Invest all compact states with the authority to hold licensed psychologists
accountable through the mutual recognition of compact state licenses.
ARTICLE II. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Adverse action" means any action taken by a state psychology
regulatory authority that finds a violation of a statute or regulation that is identified
by the state psychology regulatory authority as discipline and is a matter of public
record.
(2) "Association of State and Provincial Psychology Boards" or "ASPPB"
means the recognized membership organization composed of state and provincial
psychology regulatory authorities responsible for the licensure and registration of
psychologists throughout the United States and Canada.
(3) "Authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology" means a
licensed psychologist's authority to practice telepsychology, within the limits
authorized under this compact, in another compact state.
(4) "Bylaws" means those bylaws established by the Psychology
Interjurisdictional Compact Commission pursuant to Article X of this compact for
its governance or for directing and controlling its actions and conduct.
(5) "Client or patient" means the recipient of psychological services, whether
psychological services are delivered in the context of healthcare, corporate,
supervision, or consulting services.
Page 3 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
(6) "Commissioner" means the voting representative appointed by each state
psychology regulatory authority pursuant to Article X of this compact.
(7) "Compact state" means a state, the District of Columbia, or United States
territory that has enacted this compact legislation and which has not withdrawn
pursuant to Article XIII, Subsection C of this compact or been terminated pursuant
to Article XII, Subsection B of this compact.
(8) "Coordinated licensure information system" also referred to as
"coordinated database" means an integrated process for collecting, storing, and
sharing information on psychologists' licensure and enforcement activities related to
psychology licensure laws, which is administered by the recognized membership
organization composed of state and provincial psychology regulatory authorities.
(9) "Confidentiality" means the principle that data or information is not made
available or disclosed to unauthorized persons or processes.
(10) "Day" means any part of a day in which psychological work is
performed.
(11) "Distant state" means the compact state where a psychologist is
physically present, not through the use of telecommunications technologies, to
provide temporary in-person, face-to-face psychological services.
(12) "E.Passport" means a certificate issued by the Association of State and
Provincial Psychology Boards (ASPPB) that promotes standardization in the criteria
of interjurisdictional telepsychology practice and facilitates the process for licensed
psychologists to provide telepsychological services across state lines.
(13) "Executive board" means a group of directors elected or appointed to
act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, the commission.
(14) "Home state" means a compact state where a psychologist is licensed
to practice psychology. If the psychologist is licensed in more than one compact
state and is practicing under the authorization to practice interjurisdictional
telepsychology, the home state is the compact state where the psychologist is
physically present when the telepsychological services are delivered. If the
psychologist is licensed in more than one compact state and is practicing under the
Page 4 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
temporary authorization to practice, the home state is any compact state where the
psychologist is licensed.
(15) "Identity history summary" means a summary of information retained
by the Federal Bureau of Investigation, or other designee with similar authority, in
connection with arrests and, in some instances, federal employment, naturalization,
or military service.
(16) "In-person, face-to-face" means interactions in which the psychologist
and the client or patient are in the same physical space and which do not include
interactions that may occur through the use of telecommunication technologies.
(17) "Interjurisdictional Practice Certificate" or "IPC" means a certificate
issued by the ASPPB that grants temporary authority to practice based on
notification to the state psychology regulatory authority of intention to practice
temporarily, and verification of one's qualifications for such practice.
(18) "License" means authorization by a state psychology regulatory
authority to engage in the independent practice of psychology, which would be
unlawful without the authorization.
(19) "Non-compact state" means any state which is not at the time a compact
state.
(20) "Psychologist" means an individual licensed for the independent
practice of psychology.
(21) "Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact Commission" also referred to
as "commission" means the national administration of which all compact states are
members.
(22) "Receiving state" means a compact state where the client or patient is
physically located when the telepsychological services are delivered.
(23) "Rule" means a written statement by the Psychology Interjurisdictional
Compact Commission promulgated pursuant to Article XI of this compact that is of
general applicability, implements, interprets, or prescribes a policy or provision of
the compact, or an organizational, procedural, or practice requirement of the
Page 5 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
commission and has the force and effect of statutory law in a compact state, and
includes the amendment, repeal, or suspension of an existing rule.
(24) "Significant investigatory information" means either of the following:
(a) Investigative information that a state psychology regulatory authority,
after a preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity to respond
if required by state law, has reason to believe, if proven true, would indicate a
violation of state statute or ethics code that would be considered more substantial
than a minor infraction.
(b) Investigative information that indicates that the psychologist represents
an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of whether the
psychologist has been notified and had an opportunity to respond.
(25) "State" means a state, commonwealth, territory, or possession of the
United States, including the District of Columbia.
(26) "State psychology regulatory authority" means the board, office, or
other agency with the legislative mandate to license and regulate the practice of
psychology.
(27) "Telepsychology" means the provision of psychological services using
telecommunication technologies.
(28) "Temporary authorization to practice" means a licensed psychologist's
authority to conduct temporary in-person, face-to-face practice, within the limits
authorized under this compact, in another compact state.
(29) "Temporary in-person, face-to-face practice" means a situation in which
a psychologist is physically present, not through the use of telecommunications
technologies, in the distant state to provide for the practice of psychology for thirty
days within a calendar year and based on notification to the distant state.
ARTICLE III. HOME STATE LICENSURE
A. The home state shall be a compact state where a psychologist is licensed
to practice psychology.
B. A psychologist may hold one or more compact state licenses at a time.
If the psychologist is licensed in more than one compact state, the home state is the
Page 6 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
compact state where the psychologist is physically present when the services are
delivered as authorized by the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology
under the terms of this compact.
C. Any compact state may require a psychologist not previously licensed in
a compact state to obtain and retain a license to be authorized to practice in the
compact state under circumstances not authorized by the authority to practice
interjurisdictional telepsychology under the terms of this compact.
D. Any compact state may require a psychologist to obtain and retain a
license to be authorized to practice in a compact state under circumstances not
authorized by temporary authorization to practice under the terms of this compact.
E. A home state's license authorizes a psychologist to practice in a receiving
state under the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology only if the
compact state:
(1) Currently requires the psychologist to hold an active E.Passport.
(2) Has a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints
about licensed individuals.
(3) Notifies the commission, in compliance with the terms herein, of any
adverse action or significant investigatory information regarding a licensed
individual.
(4) Requires an identity history summary of all applicants at initial licensure,
including the use of the results of fingerprints or other biometric data checks
compliant with the requirements of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, or other
designee with similar authority, no later than ten years after activation of the
compact.
(5) Complies with the bylaws and rules of the commission.
F. A home state's license grants temporary authorization to practice to a
psychologist in a distant state only if the compact state satisfies all of the following:
(1) Currently requires the psychologist to hold an active IPC.
(2) Has a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints
about licensed individuals.
Page 7 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
(3) Notifies the commission, in compliance with the terms herein, of any
adverse action or significant investigatory information regarding a licensed
individual.
(4) Requires an identity history summary of all applicants at initial licensure,
including the use of the results of fingerprints or other biometric data checks
compliant with the requirements of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, or other
designee with similar authority, no later than ten years after activation of the
compact.
(5) Complies with the bylaws and rules of the commission.
ARTICLE IV. COMPACT PRIVILEGE TO PRACTICE TELEPSYCHOLOGY
A. Compact states shall recognize the right of a psychologist, licensed in a
compact state in conformance with Article III of this compact, to practice
telepsychology in other compact states (distant states) in which the psychologist is
not licensed, under the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology as
provided in this compact.
B. To exercise the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology
under the terms and provisions of this compact, a psychologist licensed to practice
in a compact state shall satisfy all of the following:
(1) Hold a graduate degree in psychology from an institute of higher
education that was, at the time the degree was awarded, either of the following:
(a) Regionally accredited by an accrediting body recognized by the United
States Department of Education to grant graduate degrees or authorized by provincial
statute or royal charter to grant doctoral degrees.
(b) A foreign college or university deemed to be equivalent to an institution
described in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph by a foreign credential evaluation
service that is a member of the National Association of Credential Evaluation
Services (NACES) or by a recognized foreign credential evaluation service.
(2) Hold a graduate degree in psychology that meets all of the following
criteria:
Page 8 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
(a) The program, wherever it may be administratively housed, is clearly
identified and labeled as a psychology program. Such a program shall specify in
pertinent institutional catalogues and brochures its intent to educate and train
professional psychologists.
(b) The psychology program is a recognizable, coherent, organizational
entity within the institution.
(c) The program shall establish clear authority and primary responsibility for
the core and specialty areas, whether or not the program cuts across administrative
lines.
(d) The program shall consist of an integrated, organized sequence of study.
(e) The program shall employ an identifiable psychology faculty sufficient
in size and breadth to carry out its responsibilities.
(f) The designated director of the program shall be a psychologist and a
member of the core faculty.
(g) The program shall have an identifiable body of students who are
matriculated in that program for a degree.
(h) The program shall include supervised practicum, internship, or field
training appropriate to the practice of psychology.
(i) The curriculum shall encompass a minimum of three academic years of
full- time graduate study for a doctoral degree and a minimum of one academic year
of full-time graduate study for a master's degree.
(j) The program includes an acceptable residency as defined by the rules of
the commission.
(3) Possess a current, full, and unrestricted license to practice psychology in
a home state that is a compact state.
(4) Have no history of adverse action that violates the rules of the
commission.
(5) Have no criminal record history reported on an identity history summary
that violates the rules of the commission.
(6) Possess a current, active E.Passport.
Page 9 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
(7) Provide attestations in regard to areas of intended practice, conformity
with standards of practice, competence in telepsychology technology; criminal
background; and knowledge and adherence to legal requirements in the home and
receiving states, and provide a release of information to allow for primary source
verification in a manner specified by the commission.
(8) Meet other criteria as defined by the rules of the commission.
C. The home state maintains authority over the license of any psychologist
practicing in a receiving state under the authority to practice interjurisdictional
telepsychology.
D. A psychologist practicing in a receiving state under the authority to
practice interjurisdictional telepsychology will be subject to the receiving state's
scope of practice. A receiving state may, in accordance with that state's due process
law, limit or revoke a psychologist's authority to practice interjurisdictional
telepsychology in the receiving state and may take any other necessary actions under
the receiving state's applicable law to protect the health and safety of the receiving
state's citizens. If a receiving state takes action, the state shall promptly notify the
home state and the commission.
E. If a psychologist's license in any home state, another compact state, or any
authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology in any receiving state, is
restricted, suspended, or otherwise limited, the E.Passport shall be revoked, and
therefore the psychologist shall not be eligible to practice telepsychology in a
compact state under the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology.
ARTICLE V. COMPACT TEMPORARY AUTHORIZATION TO PRACTICE
A. Compact states shall recognize the right of a psychologist, licensed in a
compact state in conformance with Article III, to practice temporarily in other
compact states (distant states) in which the psychologist is not licensed, as provided
in this compact.
B. To exercise the temporary authorization to practice under the terms and
provisions of this compact, a psychologist licensed to practice in a compact state
shall satisfy all of the following:
Page 10 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
(1) Hold a graduate degree in psychology from an institute of higher
education that was, at the time the degree was awarded, either of the following:
(a) Regionally accredited by an accrediting body recognized by the United
States Department of Education to grant graduate degrees or authorized by provincial
statute or royal charter to grant doctoral degrees.
(b) A foreign college or university deemed to be equivalent to an institution
described in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph by a foreign credential evaluation
service that is a member of the National Association of Credential Evaluation
Services (NACES) or by a recognized foreign credential evaluation service.
(2) Hold a graduate degree in psychology that meets all of the following
criteria:
(a) The program, wherever it may be administratively housed, is clearly
identified and labeled as a psychology program. Such a program shall specify in
pertinent institutional catalogues and brochures its intent to educate and train
professional psychologists.
(b) The psychology program is a recognizable, coherent, organizational
entity within the institution.
(c) The program shall establish clear authority and primary responsibility for
the core and specialty areas whether or not the program cuts across administrative
lines.
(d) The program shall consist of an integrated, organized sequence of study.
(e) The program shall employ an identifiable psychology faculty sufficient
in size and breadth to carry out its responsibilities.
(f) The designated director of the program shall be a psychologist and a
member of the core faculty.
(g) The program shall have an identifiable body of students who are
matriculated in that program for a degree.
(h) The program shall include supervised practicum, internship, or field
training appropriate to the practice of psychology.
Page 11 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
(i) The curriculum shall encompass a minimum of three academic years of
full- time graduate study for a doctoral degree and a minimum of one academic year
of full-time graduate study for a master's degree.
(j) The program includes an acceptable residency as defined by the rules of
the commission.
(3) Possess a current, full, and unrestricted license to practice psychology in
a home state that is a compact state.
(4) Have no history of adverse action that violates the rules of the
commission.
(5) Have no criminal record history that violates the rules of the commission.
(6) Possess a current, active IPC.
(7) Provide attestations in regard to areas of intended practice and work
experience and provide a release of information to allow for primary source
verification in a manner specified by the commission.
(8) Meet other criteria as defined by the rules of the commission.
C. A psychologist practicing in a distant state under the temporary
authorization to practice shall practice within the scope of practice authorized by the
distant state.
D. A psychologist practicing in a distant state under the temporary
authorization to practice will be subject to the distant state's authority and law. A
distant state may, in accordance with that state's due process law, limit or revoke a
psychologist's temporary authorization to practice in the distant state and may take
any other necessary actions under the distant state's applicable law to protect the
health and safety of the distant state's citizens. If a distant state takes action, the state
shall promptly notify the home state and the commission.
E. If a psychologist's license in any home state, another compact state, or any
temporary authorization to practice in any distant state, is restricted, suspended, or
otherwise limited, the IPC shall be revoked and therefore the psychologist shall not
be eligible to practice in a compact state under the temporary authorization to
practice.
Page 12 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
ARTICLE VI. CONDITIONS OF TELEPSYCHOLOGY PRACTICE IN A
RECEIVING STATE
A psychologist may practice in a receiving state under the authority to
practice interjurisdictional telepsychology only in the performance of the scope of
practice for psychology as assigned by an appropriate state psychology regulatory
authority, as defined in the rules of the commission, and under the following
circumstances:
(1) The psychologist initiates contact with a patient or client in a home state
via telecommunications technologies with a client or patient in a receiving state.
(2) Other conditions regarding telepsychology as determined by rules
promulgated by the commission.
ARTICLE VII. ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. A home state shall have the power to impose adverse action against a
psychologist's license issued by the home state. A distant state shall have the power
to take adverse action on a psychologist's temporary authorization to practice within
that distant state.
B. A receiving state may take adverse action on a psychologist's authority
to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology within that receiving state. A home
state may take adverse action against a psychologist based on an adverse action taken
by a distant state regarding temporary in-person, face-to-face practice.
C. If a home state takes adverse action against a psychologist's license, that
psychologist's authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology is terminated
and the E.Passport is revoked. Furthermore, that psychologist's temporary
authorization to practice is terminated and the IPC is revoked.
(1) All home state disciplinary orders that impose adverse action shall be
reported to the commission in accordance with the rules promulgated by the
commission. A compact state shall report adverse actions in accordance with the
rules of the commission.
Page 13 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
(2) In the event discipline is reported on a psychologist, the psychologist will
not be eligible for telepsychology or temporary in-person, face-to-face practice in
accordance with the rules of the commission.
(3) Other actions may be imposed as determined by the rules promulgated
by the commission.
D. A home state's psychology regulatory authority shall investigate and take
appropriate action with respect to reported inappropriate conduct engaged in by a
licensee which occurred in a receiving state as it would if such conduct had occurred
by a licensee within the home state. In such cases, the home state's law shall control
in determining any adverse action against a psychologist's license.
E. A distant state's psychology regulatory authority shall investigate and take
appropriate action with respect to reported inappropriate conduct engaged in by a
psychologist practicing under temporary authorization practice which occurred in
that distant state as it would if such conduct had occurred by a licensee within the
home state. In such cases, the distant state's law shall control in determining any
adverse action against a psychologist's temporary authorization to practice.
F. Nothing in this compact shall override a compact state's decision that a
psychologist's participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse
action and that such participation shall remain non-public if required by the compact
state's law. Compact states shall require psychologists who enter any alternative
programs to not provide telepsychology services under the authority to practice
interjurisdictional telepsychology or provide temporary psychological services under
the temporary authorization to practice in any other compact state during the term
of the alternative program.
G. No other judicial or administrative remedies shall be available to a
psychologist in the event a compact state imposes an adverse action pursuant to
Subsection C of this Article.
Page 14 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
ARTICLE VIII. ADDITIONAL AUTHORITIES INVESTED IN A COMPACT
STATE'S PSYCHOLOGY REGULATORY AUTHORITY
In addition to any other powers granted under state law, a compact state's
psychology regulatory authority shall have the authority under this compact to do all
of the following:
(1) Issue subpoenas, for both hearings and investigations, which require the
attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence. Subpoenas
issued by a compact state's psychology regulatory authority for the attendance and
testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence from another compact state
shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction according
to that court's practice and procedure in considering subpoenas issued in its own
proceedings. The issuing state psychology regulatory authority shall pay any witness
fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the service statutes of the
state where the witnesses or evidence are located.
(2) Issue cease and desist or injunctive relief orders to revoke a
psychologist's authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology or temporary
authorization to practice.
(3) During the course of any investigation, a psychologist may not change
his home state licensure. A home state psychology regulatory authority is authorized
to complete any pending investigations of a psychologist and to take any actions
appropriate under its law. The home state psychology regulatory authority shall
promptly report the conclusions of such investigations to the commission. Once an
investigation has been completed, and pending the outcome of said investigation, the
psychologist may change his home state licensure. The commission shall promptly
notify the new home state of any such decisions as provided in the rules of the
commission. All information provided to the commission or distributed by compact
states pursuant to the psychologist shall be confidential and used for investigatory
or disciplinary matters. The commission may create additional rules for mandated
or discretionary sharing of information by compact states.
Page 15 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
ARTICLE IX. COORDINATED LICENSURE INFORMATION SYSTEM
A. The commission shall provide for the development and maintenance of
a coordinated licensure information system (coordinated database) and reporting
system containing licensure and disciplinary action information on all psychologists
and individuals to whom this compact is applicable in all compact states as defined
by the rules of the commission.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a
compact state shall submit a uniform data set to the coordinated database on all
licensees as required by the rules of the commission, including all of the following:
(1) Identifying information.
(2) Licensure data.
(3) Significant investigatory information.
(4) Adverse actions against a psychologist's license.
(5) An indicator that a psychologist's authority to practice interjurisdictional
telepsychology or temporary authorization to practice is revoked.
(6) Non-confidential information related to alternative program participation
information.
(7) Any denial of application for licensure, and the reasons for such denial.
(8) Other information which may facilitate the administration of this
compact, as determined by the rules of the commission.
C. The coordinated database administrator shall promptly notify all compact
states of any adverse action taken against, or significant investigative information on,
any licensee in a compact state.
D. Compact states reporting information to the coordinated database may
designate information that may not be shared with the public without the express
permission of the compact state reporting the information.
E. Any information submitted to the coordinated database that is
subsequently required to be expunged by the law of the compact state reporting the
information shall be removed from the coordinated database.
Page 16 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
ARTICLE X. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE PSYCHOLOGY
INTERJURISDICTIONAL COMPACT COMMISSION
A. The compact states hereby create and establish a joint public agency
known as the psychology interjurisdictional compact commission.
(1) The commission is a body politic and an instrumentality of the compact
states.
(2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the commission
shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the
principal office of the commission is located. The commission may waive venue and
jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative
dispute resolution proceedings.
(3) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign
immunity.
B. Membership, voting, and meetings.
(1) The commission shall consist of one voting representative appointed by
each compact state who shall serve as that state's commissioner. The state
psychology regulatory authority shall appoint its delegate. This delegate shall be
empowered to act on behalf of the compact state. This delegate shall be limited to
one of the following:
(a) Executive director, executive secretary, or similar executive.
(b) Current member of the state psychology regulatory authority of a
compact state.
(c) Designee empowered with the appropriate delegate authority to act on
behalf of the compact state.
(2) Any commissioner may be removed or suspended from office as
provided by the law of the state from which the commissioner is appointed. Any
vacancy occurring in the commission shall be filled in accordance with the laws of
the compact state in which the vacancy exists.
(3) Each commissioner shall be entitled to one vote with regard to the
promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity
Page 17 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
to participate in the business and affairs of the commission. A commissioner shall
vote in person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may
provide for commissioners' participation in meetings by telephone or other means of
communication.
(4) The commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year.
Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws.
(5) All meetings shall be open to the public, and public notice of meetings
shall be given in the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in
Article XI of this compact.
(6) The commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting if the
commission is required to discuss any of the following:
(a) Non-compliance of a compact state with its obligations under the
compact.
(b) The employment, compensation, discipline or other personnel matters,
practices or procedures related to specific employees, or other matters related to the
commission's internal personnel practices and procedures.
(c) Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation against the
commission.
(d) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of goods, services, or
real estate.
(e) Accusation against any person of a crime or formally censuring any
person.
(f) Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that
is privileged or confidential.
(g) Disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would
constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy.
(h) Disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law enforcement
purposes.
(i) Disclosure of information related to any investigatory reports prepared
by or on behalf of or for use of the commission or other committee charged with
Page 18 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
responsibility for investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the
compact.
(j) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal and state statute.
(7) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant to this provision,
the commission's legal counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting may be
closed and shall reference each relevant exempting provision. The commission shall
keep minutes which fully and clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and
shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, of any person
participating in the meeting, and the reasons therefor, including a description of the
views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action shall be
identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall
remain under seal, subject to release only by a majority vote of the commission or
order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
C. The commission shall, by a majority vote of the commissioners, prescribe
bylaws and rules to govern its conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry
out the purposes and exercise the powers of the compact, including but not limited
to all of the following:
(1) Establishing the fiscal year of the commission.
(2) Providing reasonable standards and procedures for all of the following:
(a) For the establishment and meetings of other committees.
(b) Governing any general or specific delegation of any authority or function
of the commission.
(3) Providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of
the commission, ensuring reasonable advance notice of all meetings, and providing
an opportunity for attendance of such meetings by interested parties, with
enumerated exceptions designed to protect the public's interest, the privacy of
individuals of such proceedings, and proprietary information, including trade secrets.
The commission may meet in closed session only after a majority of the
commissioners vote to close a meeting to the public in whole or in part. As soon as
Page 19 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
practicable, the commission shall make public a copy of the vote to close the meeting
revealing the vote of each commissioner with no proxy votes allowed.
(4) Establishing the titles, duties, and authority and reasonable procedures
for the election of the officers of the commission.
(5) Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the establishment of
the personnel policies and programs of the commission. Notwithstanding any civil
service or other similar law of any compact state, the bylaws shall exclusively govern
the personnel policies and programs of the commission.
(6) Promulgating a code of ethics to address permissible and prohibited
activities of commission members and employees.
(7) Providing a mechanism for concluding the operations of the commission
and the equitable disposition of any surplus funds that may exist after the termination
of the compact after the payment and reserving of all of its debts and obligations.
(8) The commission shall publish its bylaws in a convenient form and file
a copy thereof and a copy of any amendment thereto, with the appropriate agency or
officer in each of the compact states.
(9) The commission shall maintain its financial records in accordance with
the bylaws.
(10) The commission shall meet and take such actions as are consistent with
the provisions of this compact and the bylaws.
D. The commission shall have all of the following powers:
(1) The authority to promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and coordinate
implementation and administration of this compact. The rules shall have the force
and effect of law and shall be binding in all compact states.
(2) To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
commission, provided that the standing of any state psychology regulatory authority
or other regulatory body responsible for psychology licensure to sue or be sued under
applicable law shall not be affected.
(3) To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds.
Page 20 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
(4) To borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel including but not
limited to employees of a compact state.
(5) To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define
duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the
compact, and to establish the commission's personnel policies and programs relating
to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel
matters.
(6) To accept any and all appropriate donations and grants of money,
equipment, supplies, materials, and services and to receive, utilize, and dispose of
the same; provided that at all times the commission shall strive to avoid any
appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest.
(7) To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise
to own, hold, improve, or use any property, real, personal, or mixed; provided that
at all times the commission shall strive to avoid any appearance of impropriety.
(8) To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or
otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal, or mixed.
(9) To establish a budget and make expenditures.
(10) To borrow money.
(11) To appoint committees, including advisory committees comprised of
members, state regulators, state legislators or their representatives, consumer
representatives, and such other interested persons as may be designated in this
compact and the bylaws.
(12) To provide and receive information from, and to cooperate with, law
enforcement agencies.
(13) To adopt and use an official seal.
(14) To perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to
achieve the purposes of this compact consistent with the state regulation of
psychology licensure, temporary in-person, face-to-face practice, and telepsychology
practice.
Page 21 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
E. The executive board. The elected officers shall serve as the executive
board, which shall have the power to act on behalf of the commission according to
the terms of this compact.
(1) The executive board shall be comprised of the following members:
(a) Five voting members who are elected from the current membership of the
commission by the commission.
(b) One ex officio, nonvoting member from the recognized membership
organization composed of state and provincial psychology regulatory authorities.
(2) The ex officio member will have served as staff or member on a state
psychology regulatory authority and will be selected by its respective organization.
(3) The commission may remove any member of the executive board as
provided in bylaws.
(4) The executive board shall meet at least annually.
(5) The executive board shall have all of the following duties and
responsibilities:
(a) Recommend to the entire commission changes to the rules or bylaws,
changes to this compact legislation, fees paid by compact states, such as annual dues,
and any other applicable fees.
(b) Ensure compact administration services are appropriately provided,
contractual or otherwise.
(c) Prepare and recommend the budget.
(d) Maintain financial records on behalf of the commission.
(e) Monitor compact compliance of member states and provide compliance
reports to the commission.
(f) Establish additional committees as necessary.
(g) Other duties as provided in rules or bylaws.
F. Financing of the commission.
(1) The commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable
expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
Page 22 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
(2) The commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources,
donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services.
(3) The commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each
compact state or impose fees on other parties to cover the cost of the operations and
activities of the commission and its staff which shall be in a total amount sufficient
to cover its annual budget as approved each year for which revenue is not provided
by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated based
upon a formula to be determined by the commission, which shall promulgate a rule
binding upon all compact states.
(4) The commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing
the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the commission pledge the credit of
any of the compact states, except by and with the authority of the compact state.
(5) The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be subject
to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all
receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the commission shall be audited
yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant and the report of the audit shall
be included in and become part of the annual report of the commission.
G. Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification.
(1) The members, officers, executive director, employees, and
representatives of the commission shall be immune from suit and liability, either
personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of
property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any
actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against
whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; nothing in this
Paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person from suit and liability for
any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton
misconduct of that person.
Page 23 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
(2) The commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director,
employee or representative of the commission in any civil action seeking to impose
liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred
within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that the
person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided
that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining his or her
own counsel; and provided further, that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission
did not result from that person's intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
(3) The commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer,
executive director, employee, or representative of the commission for the amount of
any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or
alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis
for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not
result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING
A. The commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the
criteria set forth in this article and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules and
amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule or
amendment.
B. If a majority of the legislatures of the compact states rejects a rule, by
enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the compact,
then such rule shall have no further force and effect in any compact state.
C. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a regular or special
meeting of the commission.
D. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the
commission, and at least sixty days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will
be considered and voted upon, the commission shall file a notice of proposed
Page 24 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
rulemaking on the website of the commission and the website of each compact state's
psychology regulatory authority or the publication in which each state would
otherwise publish proposed rules.
E. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include all of the following:
(1) The proposed time, date, and location of the meeting in which the rule
will be considered and voted upon.
(2) The text of the proposed rule or amendment and the reason for the
proposed rule.
(3) A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person.
(4) The manner in which interested persons may submit notice to the
commission of their intention to attend the public hearing and any written comments.
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the commission shall allow persons
to submit written data, facts, opinions, and arguments, which shall be made available
to the public.
G. The commission shall grant an opportunity for a public hearing before it
adopts a rule or amendment if a hearing is requested by any of the following:
(1) At least twenty five persons who submit comments independently of each
other.
(2) A governmental subdivision or agency.
(3) A duly appointed person in an association that has at least twenty-five
members.
H. If a hearing is held on the proposed rule or amendment, the commission
shall publish the place, time, and date of the scheduled public hearing.
(1) All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall notify the executive
director of the commission or other designated member in writing of their desire to
appear and testify at the hearing not less than five business days before the scheduled
date of the hearing.
(2) Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each person who
wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in
writing.
Page 25 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
(3) No transcript of the hearing is required unless a written request for a
transcript is made, in which case the person requesting the transcript shall bear the
cost of producing the transcript. A recording may be made in lieu of a transcript
under the same terms and conditions as a transcript. This Paragraph shall not
preclude the commission from making a transcript or recording of the hearing if it
so chooses.
(4) Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed as requiring a separate
hearing on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the commission
at hearings required by this Subsection.
I. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of business on the
scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not held, the commission shall consider all
written and oral comments received.
J. The commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take final action
on the proposed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based
on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.
K. If no written notice of intent to attend the public hearing by interested
parties is received, the commission may proceed with promulgation of the proposed
rule without a public hearing.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the commission may
consider and adopt an emergency rule without prior notice, opportunity for comment,
or hearing, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the compact
and in this Subsection shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably
possible, in no event later than ninety days after the effective date of the rule. For
the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that is required to be adopted
immediately in order to do any of the following:
(1) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare.
(2) Prevent a loss of commission or compact state funds.
(3) Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that is
established by federal law or rule.
(4) Protect public health and safety.
Page 26 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
M. The commission or an authorized committee of the commission may
direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting
typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors.
Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the commission. The
revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty days after
posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results
in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered
to the chair of the commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge
is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the revision is
challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the commission.
ARTICLE XII. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight.
(1) The executive, legislative, and judicial branches of state government in
each compact state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and
appropriate to effectuate the compact's purposes and intent. The provisions of this
compact and the rules promulgated hereunder shall have standing as statutory law.
(2) All courts shall take judicial notice of the compact and the rules in any
judicial or administrative proceeding in a compact state pertaining to the subject
matter of this compact which may affect the powers, responsibilities, or actions of
the commission.
(3) The commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any
such proceeding and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all
purposes. Failure to provide service of process to the commission shall render a
judgment or order void as to the commission, this compact, or promulgated rules.
B. Default, technical assistance, and termination.
(1) If the commission determines that a compact state has defaulted in the
performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the
promulgated rules, the commission shall do all of the following:
Page 27 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
(a) Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other compact states of
the nature of the default, the proposed means of remedying the default, or any other
action to be taken by the commission.
(b) Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the
default.
(2) If a state in default fails to remedy the default, the defaulting state may
be terminated from the compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the
compact states, and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred by this compact shall
be terminated on the effective date of termination. A remedy of the default does not
relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of
default.
(3) Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only after
all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to
suspend or terminate shall be submitted by the commission to the governor, the
majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state's legislature, and each of the
compact states.
(4) A compact state which has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of
termination, including obligations which extend beyond the effective date of
termination.
(5) The commission shall not bear any costs incurred by the state which is
found to be in default or which has been terminated from the compact, unless agreed
upon in writing between the commission and the defaulting state.
(6) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the commission by
petitioning the United States District Court for the state of Georgia or the federal
district where the compact has its principal offices. The prevailing member shall be
awarded all costs of such litigation including reasonable attorney's fees.
Page 28 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
C. Dispute resolution.
(1) Upon request by a compact state, the commission shall attempt to resolve
disputes related to the compact which arise among compact states and between
compact and non-compact states.
(2) The commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation
and binding dispute resolution for disputes that arise before the commission.
D. Enforcement.
(1) The commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce
the provisions and rules of this compact.
(2) By majority vote, the commission may initiate legal action in the United
States District Court for the State of Georgia or the federal district where the
compact has its principal offices against a compact state in default to enforce
compliance with the provisions of the compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws.
The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event
judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing member shall be awarded all costs
of such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees.
(3) The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the
commission. The commission may pursue any other remedies available under
federal or state law.
ARTICLE XIII. DATE OF IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PSYCHOLOGY
INTERJURISDICTIONAL COMPACT COMMISSION AND ASSOCIATED RULES,
WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENTS
A. The compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact is
enacted into law in the seventh compact state. The provisions which become
effective at that time shall be limited to the powers granted to the commission
relating to assembly and the promulgation of rules. Thereafter, the commission shall
meet and exercise rulemaking powers necessary for the implementation and
administration of the compact.
Page 29 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
B. Any state which joins the compact subsequent to the commission's initial
adoption of the rules shall be subject to the rules as they exist on the date on which
the compact becomes law in that state. Any rule which has been previously adopted
by the commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the compact
becomes law in that state.
C. Any compact state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute
repealing the same.
(1) A compact state's withdrawal shall not take effect until six months after
enactment of the repealing statute.
(2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the
withdrawing state's psychology regulatory authority to comply with the investigative
and adverse action reporting requirements of this compact prior to the effective date
of withdrawal.
D. Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or
prevent any psychology licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement
between a compact state and a non-compact state which does not conflict with the
provisions of this compact.
E. This compact may be amended by the compact states. No amendment to
this compact shall become effective and binding upon any compact state until it is
enacted into the law of all compact states.
ARTICLE XIV. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes
thereof. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state
member thereto, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining
compact states.
Section 2. R.S. 44:4.1(B)(24) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4.1. Exceptions
* * *
B. The legislature further recognizes that there exist exceptions, exemptions,
and limitations to the laws pertaining to public records throughout the revised
Page 30 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 486 ENROLLED
statutes and codes of this state. Therefore, the following exceptions, exemptions, and
limitations are hereby continued in effect by incorporation into this Chapter by
citation:
* * *
(24) R.S. 37:74, 86, 90, 147, 691, 711.10, 763, 763.1, 781, 799, 920.1, 969.1,
1123(E), 1249.1, 1277, 1278, 1285, 1326, 1338.1, 1360.53.1, 1360.104.1, 1518,
1745.15, 1747, 1806, 2156.1, 2371, 2406, 2505.1, 2863.1, 3276.2, 3481, 3507.1
* * *
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2028.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 31 of 31
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.